Utah statutes.
57-14-3.   Owner owes no duty of care or duty to give warning -- Exceptions.
Except as provided in Subsections 57-14-6(1) and (2), an owner of land owes no
duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by any person entering
or using the premises for any recreational purpose or to give any warning of a
dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on those premises to that
person.
